Idaho, session 2026, S1419.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 25, Title 56, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 25
IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM
56-2501. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Child care" means care, control, supervision, or maintenance of a
child provided for compensation by an individual, other than a parent of the
child, for less than twenty-four (24) hours in a day.
(2) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(3) "Eligible child" means a child under thirteen (13) years of age who
is either a citizen of or lawfully living in the United States. However, a
child who is thirteen (13) years of age or older remains eligible if the child
is under court supervision or is verified by either a mental health profes-
sional or licensed medical professional to be physically or mentally unable
to care for himself.
(4) "FPG" means the federal poverty guidelines published annually by
the United States department of health and human services.
(5) "Intentional program violation" means an intentionally false or
misleading action or statement that is one (1) of the following:


(a) An individual makes a false or misleading statement to the depart-
ment, either orally or in writing, in order to participate in the pro-
gram;
(b) An individual misrepresents or conceals one (1) or more facts to the
department, either orally or in writing, to participate in the program;
(c) An individual fails repeatedly or substantially to comply with rel-
evant state or federal laws or rules promulgated under this chapter;
(d) An individual knowingly violates any term of the individual's
provider agreement; or
(e) A provider knowingly fails to meet the qualifications specifically
required in relevant federal law, in this chapter, in chapter 11, title
39, Idaho Code, or the rules promulgated under any of the forgoing laws.
(6) "Parent" means a person responsible for a child because of birth,
adoption, marriage, legal guardianship, or foster care.
(7) "Program" means the Idaho child care program.
(8) "Provider" means an individual, organization, agency, or other en-
tity providing child care.
(9) "SMI" means the current state median income estimates determined
for the low income home energy assistance program.
56-2502. CREATION OF PROGRAM. There is hereby created in the depart-
ment the Idaho child care program, which, subject to legislative appro-
priation, shall use federal child care funds distributed to the states, as
well as any related state matching funds and maintenance-of-effort funds,
to improve the quality of child care in Idaho for all children and assist
low-income families in Idaho who are working or participating in education
or training activities with help paying for child care, to promote parental
choice to empower working parents to make decisions regarding the child care
services that best suit the needs of individual families, and to maximize
options available to parents. The department shall administer the program
in a manner consistent with this chapter and with all applicable federal
requirements.
56-2503. PARENT QUALIFYING ACTIVITIES. (1) Parents in a child's
household must participate in qualifying activities as provided in this sub-
section to be eligible for assistance under this chapter:
(a) For a two (2) parent household:
(i) At least one (1) parent is employed or self-employed no less
than an average of thirty (30) hours per week per month; and
(ii) The other parent is either:
1. Employed no less than an average of twenty (20) hours per
week per month; or
2. Enrolled and participating in a recognized or accredited
school, training program, or institution of higher educa-
tion for a minimum of twenty (20) hours each week, as deter-
mined by the department; or
(b) For a one (1) parent household, which shall include a household
where the parent is under eighteen (18) years of age and is not the head
of the household:


(i) The parent is employed or self-employed no less than an aver-
age of thirty (30) hours per week per month; or
(ii) The parent is enrolled and participating in a recognized or
accredited school, training program, or institution of higher ed-
ucation for a minimum of twenty (20) hours each week, as determined
by the department.
(2) In a two (2) parent household, an incapacitated parent is not re-
quired to participate in a qualifying activity pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section if the other parent participates in a qualifying activity. An
incapacitated parent in a one (1) parent household is not eligible for the
program. As used in this subsection, "incapacitated parent" means a parent
who is determined by a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner,
or clinical nurse specialist licensed under the laws of this state to be un-
fit, incapable, or significantly limited in the ability to provide adequate
care for the child or ward. A parent's disability diagnosis alone does not
qualify a parent as incapacitated without the licensed provider making the
findings required by this subsection.
(3) The following restrictions shall apply to training or education ac-
tivities:
(a) Online classes shall not be counted as a qualifying activity under
this chapter;
(b) Persons who are attending postbaccalaureate classes with no other
qualifying activity shall not qualify for assistance under this chap-
ter; and
(c) No more than forty-eight (48) months of postsecondary education
shall count as a qualifying activity.
56-2504. APPLICATION -- ELIGIBILITY -- REDETERMINATION. (1) A family
who resides in the state of Idaho with no immediate intention of leaving the
state may apply to be considered for assistance under this chapter for an el-
igible child.
(2) An applicant's family assets cannot exceed five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000), as certified by the applicant.
(3) When applying, a family's income cannot exceed one hundred thirty-
five percent (135%) of FPG for a family of the same size.
(4) During the eligibility period, a family's income cannot exceed
eighty-five percent (85%) of the SMI for a family of the same size.
(5) At least every twelve (12) months, the department shall redeter-
mine eligibility for assistance under this chapter. At redetermination, if
a family's income exceeds one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) but is less
than one hundred seventy percent (170%) of FPG for a family of the same size,
the family may be eligible to receive a graduated phaseout of child care as-
sistance that is limited to up to twelve (12) months of assistance following
the completion of redetermination.
56-2505. AUTHORITY TO CREATE A WAITING LIST AND ADJUST ELIGIBIL-
ITY. (1) As necessary to administer the program, the department may estab-
lish a waiting list for the program. If the department establishes a waiting
list, the department shall give priority to the following categories:
(a) Families who are homeless;


(b) Families caring for a child with a disability;
(c) Foster families;
(d) Families receiving temporary assistance for needy families from
the department;
(e) Families receiving any child welfare preventative services from
the department designed to reduce or eliminate the need for out-of-home
placement of a child by the department; and
(f) Households where at least one (1) parent is nineteen (19) years of
age or younger.
56-2506. REQUIREMENTS FOR PROVIDERS. (1) Providers who receive assis-
tance on behalf of eligible children under this chapter shall enter into and
abide by the terms of a provider agreement with the department and shall gen-
erate documentation at the time of service sufficient to support the reim-
bursement for child care services. Providers are required to keep the fol-
lowing child care records:
(a) Proof of enrollment for each eligible child, with authentication of
a parent;
(b) Proof of attendance each day with authentication of a parent,
guardian, or preapproved designee dropping off and retrieving each
child;
(c) Billing and receipts;
(d) Policies or manuals developed by the provider governing procedures
for billing, attendance, attendance and enrollment tracking and veri-
fication, copayment collection, and operating hours;
(e) All rates, fees, and costs of any kind charged by the provider; and
(f) Any other related records required by the department for adminis-
tration of the program.
(2) The department shall be permitted access at any time of business op-
erations to the child care facilities of a provider who is receiving assis-
tance on behalf of an eligible child and to monitor and inspect the facility.
The department shall be permitted to access, inspect, review, copy, or re-
move any child care records required by this chapter. A provider shall im-
mediately produce records or provide access upon request by the department.
Records required by this section shall be kept available by the child care
facility at all times for a minimum of three (3) years.
(3) Any business entity or individual providing child care who is re-
ceiving assistance on behalf of an eligible child under this chapter shall be
registered as a business entity with the Idaho secretary of state.
(4) A provider shall receive payment for assistance on behalf of an eli-
gible child only after substantiating child care attendance and documenting
legitimate services provided in a manner and on a cadence prescribed by the
department.
(5) A provider is prohibited from paying, directly or indirectly or
overtly or covertly, for an eligible child to attend the provider's child
care facility.
(6) Providers are responsible for ensuring families pay the determined
child care costs and may not waive these costs.
(7) Providers receiving assistance on behalf of an eligible child shall
not be considered employees of the department and shall not hold themselves


out as employees of the department by virtue of their participation in the
program.
(8) If a provider is an individual, the provider must be either a citi-
zen of or lawfully living in the United States. If the provider is a business
entity, the provider must not knowingly hire or employ an employee who is not
either a citizen of or lawfully living in the United States.
(9) A provider who is receiving assistance on behalf of an eligible
child under this chapter shall develop policies, procedures, and controls
to govern fiscal responsibility. A provider operating a daycare center, as
defined in 39-1102, Idaho Code, shall:
(a) In the case of a nonprofit provider, cause an annual financial audit
to be conducted; or
(b) In the case of a for-profit provider, adhere to generally accepted
accounting principles and maintain financial statements and documenta-
tion of business-related expenses.
56-2507. PROGRAM INTEGRITY. (1) When the department has reasonable
suspicion to believe that a provider seeks payment on behalf of an eligible
child in a manner contrary to state or federal law, the department is autho-
rized to immediately suspend payment and conduct an investigation. Reasons
to suspend payment include but are not limited to:
(a) Any claims for child care services for which the department has a
reasonable suspicion were not provided;
(b) Child care services not documented by the provider as required by
law or the provider agreement;
(c) Child care services provided contrary to state or federal law or the
provider agreement;
(d) Failure to maintain records or provide immediate access to records
as required by law;
(e) The department believes a provider is paying for an eligible child
to attend the provider's child care facility in violation of law or the
provider agreement; or
(f) The department has determined that an intentional program viola-
tion has occurred and has provided notice of this determination.
(2) If the department determines that an intentional program violation
has occurred, the department shall send written notice of the determination
to the family or provider stating the reasons for the determination. The
decision of the department may be appealed to the office of administrative
hearings within twenty-eight (28) days of the date of the issuance of the no-
tice to the family or provider. The department may continue any suspension
of payment for the duration of the administrative appeal.
(a) The office of administrative hearings shall, within twenty-eight
(28) days of receipt of the appeal, review the full record regarding the
department's decision and hold a hearing. After the hearing, the ad-
ministrative law judge shall submit a written recommendation to the de-
partment and the family or provider. The recommendation by the adminis-
trative law judge either to affirm or reverse the department's decision
shall be based on the full record of the department's decision and rel-
evant state and federal law. The recommendation by the administrative
law judge shall be in writing and accompanied by a reasoned opinion.


(b) Within twenty-eight (28) days following the issuance of the hear-
ing officer's written recommendation, the department shall either af-
firm or reverse its initial decision.
(c) If, upon reconsideration of its initial decision, the department:
(i) Affirms its initial decision, the family or provider may ap-
peal pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code; or
(ii) Reverses its initial decision, then there shall be no fur-
ther appeal and payments shall resume, including back payments.
(3) An intentional program violation is established when a family or
provider admits the violation in writing and waives any right to a hearing
or appeal pursuant to this section or when determined by the department pur-
suant to this section. The consequences the department may impose for fraud
or any established intentional program violations are as follows:
(a) Any family or provider who is established to have committed an in-
tentional program violation shall be ineligible for the program for no
less than one (1) year but up to a period of three (3) years, as deter-
mined by the department.
(b) Any family or provider who is established to have committed a second
intentional program violation shall be ineligible for the program for a
period of no less than two (2) years but up to a period of five (5) years,
as determined by the department.
(c) Any family or provider who is established to have committed a third
or subsequent intentional program violation shall be permanently inel-
igible for the program.
(4) When the department establishes an intentional program violation,
it shall verify that any other benefits an individual receives pursuant to
this title strictly conform with state and federal law.
(5) For a first violation of the provisions of this subsection, the
department may exercise the authority granted pursuant to section 56-209h,
Idaho Code, to terminate a provider agreement or otherwise deny provider
status for up to five (5) years. Any termination for a second or subsequent
violation shall be for a minimum period of five (5) years up to permanent
ineligibility for the program, in the discretion of the department. The
department may terminate provider status for any provider who:
(a) Submits a claim with knowledge the claim is incorrect;
(b) Submits a fraudulent claim;
(c) Knowingly makes a false statement or representation of material
facts in any document required to be maintained or submitted to the de-
partment;
(d) Fails repeatedly or substantially to comply with relevant federal
law, this chapter, or any rules promulgated under this chapter;
(e) Knowingly violates any material term or condition of the provider
agreement;
(f) Has failed to repay, or was a managing entity or had an ownership
or control interest in any entity that has failed to repay, any overpay-
ments or claims previously found to have been obtained contrary to rel-
evant federal law, this chapter or the rules promulgated thereunder, or
the provider agreement;
(g) Has been found, or was a managing employee in any entity that has
been found, to have engaged in fraudulent conduct or abusive conduct;


(h) Fails to meet the qualifications specifically required in relevant
state or federal law, including chapter 11, title 39, Idaho Code, for
providers licensed pursuant to that chapter; or
(i) Knowingly hires or employs an employee who is not either a citizen
of or lawfully living in the United States, if the provider is a business
entity.
(6) The department may refuse to enter into a provider agreement when:
(a) The provider has been convicted of a felony offense;
(b) The provider has failed to repay the department moneys that had been
previously determined to have been owed to the department;
(c) The provider has a pending investigation for program fraud or
abuse;
(d) The provider was the managing employee, officer, or owner of an en-
tity whose provider agreement was terminated pursuant to subsection (5)
of this section; or
(e) The provider has a current exclusion from participation in federal
programs by the department of health and human services office of the
inspector general list of excluded individuals and entities.
(7) For any overpayment to a provider for assistance on behalf of an
eligible child, the department is authorized to recoup or recover the full
amount of overpayment. Interest shall accrue on overpayments at the statu-
tory rate established in section 28-22-104, Idaho Code, from the date of the
final determination of overpayment; provided, however, interest shall not
accrue on overpayments made due to department error. Any overpayment due to
family or provider error, intentional program violation, or fraud shall be
recovered in full.
(8) Department authorities provided pursuant to this section shall not
be construed to limit any other authorities available to the department in
other relevant state or federal law to prevent or respond to fraud, waste, or
abuse and ensure program integrity.
(9) The department is authorized to collaborate with local, state, and
federal law enforcement to ensure providers and families comply with state
and federal law and to aid in the prosecution of any criminal violations of
the law arising from the program.
(10) The department may promulgate administrative rules, subject to
legislative approval, to prevent fraud, waste, or abuse in the program and to
ensure program integrity.
(11) The department shall submit a report to the legislature by November
1 of each year containing relevant results from the program integrity mea-
sures implemented in this section. The first report in compliance with this
subsection shall include information about the program dating back to 2019
through the current year and any relevant findings.
56-2508. PROGRAM OVERSIGHT. The department shall, for the purposes
of carrying out the provisions of section 56-2507, Idaho Code, implement
a fraud detection and remediation system that shall assist in detecting,
preventing, and deterring fraud, waste, and abuse in the Idaho child care
program.


56-2509. CONSTRUCTION. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
create a right or entitlement to any assistance or benefit to any child, par-
ent, family, or provider.
56-2510. AUTHORITY OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. The department shall re-
fer criminal violations of state law that involve or are directly related to
this program to the attorney general. When the department refers a case to
the attorney general, he is authorized to exercise concurrent investigative
and prosecutorial authority and responsibility with county prosecutors to:
(1) Prosecute persons for the violation of the criminal provisions of
chapter 2, title 56, Idaho Code, that involve or are directly related to this
program; and
(2) Prosecute persons for criminal offenses that are not defined in
chapter 2, title 56, Idaho Code, but that involve or are directly related to
this program.
56-2511. STATE PLAN -- LEGISLATIVE APPROVAL REQUIRED. (1) The depart-
ment shall not seek or implement a state plan amendment for the program that
would expand benefits to any additional individuals or class of individuals
or would increase any net cost to the state without obtaining approval from
the legislature. Such approval must be provided in statute and, to be effec-
tive, must be listed in this chapter.
(2) The department shall prepare and submit to the legislature by
November 1, 2026, a report containing a proposed state plan amendment for
the program that shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter
and federal law. If approved as required by subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall submit the state plan amendment to the United States
department of health and human services.
56-2512. REQUEST FOR INFORMATION. The department shall issue a formal
request for information on available child care program integrity and over-
sight tools and technology and associated costs. As used in this section,
program integrity and oversight includes platforms that support child care
providers through training, professional development, and scholarships,
while also helping families find child care, and that promote program in-
tegrity. The department shall prepare and submit a summary report to the
legislature no later than November 1, 2026, on available options.
56-2513. ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. The department shall seek to move all
necessary rules related to the provisions of this chapter into this chapter
and eliminate any existing rules that are duplicative or conflicting with
the provisions of this chapter by July 1, 2027.
56-2514. USE OF FUNDS FOR CAPACITY BUILDING. Any appropriation to
the program for capacity building through contracts, grants, or subgrants
shall prioritize populations as outlined in section 4.5.4 of the Idaho child
care and development fund plan to include infants and toddlers, children in
underserved geographic areas, children with disabilities, children who re-
ceive care during non-traditional hours, and school-aged children that meet
one (1) or more of the preceding criteria. Capacity building funds shall


also be prioritized for providers serving children who are in foster care
or who are homeless. Qualifying providers may be licensed, non-licensed,
or license-exempt. Any provider the department is investigating or has re-
ferred to a county prosecutor, to the office of the attorney general, or to
the United States attorney's office for prosecution of fraud or misuse of
public funds shall not be eligible for provider capacity building funds.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-1111, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1111. RULES AUTHORIZED. In order to implement the provisions of
this chapter, the department, in addition to other duties imposed by law,
is hereby authorized and directed through rulemaking may promulgate rules,
subject to legislative approval, to establish procedures necessary to im-
plement the provisions of this chapter including procedure for submission
of required certificates as provided in sections 39-1109 and 39-1110, Idaho
Code, and to conduct the criminal history check provided in section 39-1105,
Idaho Code. The rulemaking authority granted in this section shall be lim-
ited to the specific standards and procedures required by this chapter. The
department shall seek to move all necessary rules into this chapter by July
1, 2026 2027.
SECTION 3. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.06.12, Department of Health
and Welfare, relating to Idaho Child Care Program, shall be null, void, and
of no force and effect on and after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 4. The provisions of Section 1 of this act shall be null, void,
and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2028.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.